Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.151

License—Expiration and renewal—Fee.

Each escrow agent's license shall expire at noon on the thirty-first day of December of any calendar year. The license may be renewed by filing an application and paying the annual license fee for the next succeeding calendar year.

[ 1999 c 30 s 13; 1985 c 340 s 2; 1965 c 153 s 11. Formerly RCW 18.44.110.]